Maine, session 132, LD1998.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §6152, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 229, §2, is amended to
read:
2. Limitations. A cash-dispensing machine:
A. May not accept deposits or loan payments or effectuate account transfers other than
those transfers between the customer's accounts in the same financial institution; and
B. Must be operated in such a way as to comply with the Electronic Funds Transfer
Act, 15 United States Code, Section 1693 et seq. or regulations adopted under that Act.;
and
C. May not operate as a virtual currency kiosk as defined in section 6164, subsection
3 unless the virtual currency kiosk operator is licensed as a money transmitter pursuant
to section 6165.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §6153, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 229, §2, is
amended to read:
B. A registration fee of $50 for the first cash-dispensing machine location operator and
$25 for each additional location, payable to the Treasurer of State cash-dispensing
machine.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §6153, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry. The administrator may
require registration under this section through the nationwide mortgage licensing system
and registry as defined in Title 9‑A, section 13‑102, subsection 8. The administrator is
authorized to participate in the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §6153, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2811(02)

1-B. Registration requirements. In all cases, whether registration is through the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry or otherwise, the administrator may
establish, by rule, requirements for registration, including but not limited to:
A. Background checks for:
(1) Criminal history through fingerprint or other databases;
(2) Civil or administrative records;
(3) Credit history; or
(4) Any other information determined necessary by the nationwide mortgage
licensing system and registry;
B. The payment of fees to apply for or renew registration. If registration is through the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry, an applicant must also pay a
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry processing fee in an amount to be
determined by the administrators of the nationwide mortgage licensing system and
registry. Renewal applications received after the due date are subject to an additional
fee of $100;
C. The setting or resetting as necessary of renewal or reporting dates; and
D. Other requirements for application for, amendment of or revocation of a registration
or any other such activities as the administrator considers necessary.
The aggregate of registration fees and other fees and assessments provided for by this
section is appropriated for the use of the administrator. Any balance of these funds does
not lapse but must be carried forward to be expended for the same purpose in the following
fiscal year.
Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §6153, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 229, §2, is amended to
read:
6. Fine. The administrator may impose a fine of $5 $25 per day on any person failing
to comply with the requirements of this section.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §6154, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. If registration is through the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry,
the operator’s unique identifier as defined in Title 9-A, section 13-102, subsection 15;
Page 2 - 132LR2811(02)